Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 52

Estimated Rate of Growth of Economy; Limitation on Appropriations

9-4-5201. Basis for estimated rate of growth of economy.

The estimated rate of growth of the state's economy shall be based upon the projected change in Tennessee personal income.

Tennessee personal income shall consist of those sources of income included in the United States department of commerce's definition of “personal income.”

Acts 1979, ch. 408, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 9-621, 9-6-201.

Cross-References. General assembly to determine rate of growth of expenditures, Tenn. Const., art. II, § 24.

9-4-5202. Reports of estimated rate of growth of economy — Duties of state funding board.

At least once each year, and whenever requested to do so by the commissioner of finance and administration or by the joint request of the chairs of the finance, ways and means committees of the senate and house of representatives, the state funding board shall secure from the Tennessee econometric model a report of the estimated rate of growth of the state's economy. Such report shall include the major assumptions and the methodology used in arriving at such estimate.

Upon receiving the report specified in subsection (a), the state funding board shall make comments relating to the reasonableness of the estimate, including any different estimate the board deems necessary. The board shall also enclose a list identifying state tax revenue sources and nontax revenue sources, approved by the attorney general and reporter. The department of finance and administration shall provide to the board revenue estimates for each source. The department of revenue shall provide to the board estimates of growth in franchise and excise tax revenue and include in the estimates a description of whether the growth is nonrecurring or recurring.

In the event data from Tennessee econometric model is unavailable, the funding board, after consulting with the finance, ways and means committees of the senate and house of representatives, shall obtain and/or prepare a report of the estimated rate of growth of the state's economy.

The reports specified in subsections (a), (b) and (c) shall be forwarded to the commissioner of finance and administration and to each member of the general assembly, after review and definitive comment by the finance, ways and means committees of the senate and house of representatives.

In November of each year, the state funding board shall conduct public hearings to develop estimates of state revenue for the upcoming fiscal year, as well as any revisions to the current fiscal year estimates, as the board deems appropriate. All estimates shall be adopted by a majority vote of the entire board.

The funding board shall request economic forecasts and revenue estimates from representatives of state higher education institution business centers located in each of the grand divisions and such other groups or persons as the funding board deems appropriate.

On December 1, or as soon thereafter as practical, the funding board shall present its state revenue estimates, together with a summary of the economic forecast upon which the estimates are based, to the governor and the chairs of the finance, ways and means committees of the senate and house of representatives. If, in the opinion of the funding board, circumstances warrant a review of state revenue estimates it has previously presented, or upon a request of the chairs, the funding board shall consider information it deems necessary and appropriate and may revise its state revenue estimates if appropriate. Any revision to its revenue estimates and reasons therefor shall be forwarded to the governor and chairs.

The funding board shall identify and report in its presentation of state revenue estimates whether any growth in franchise and excise tax revenue is nonrecurring or recurring.

Acts 1979, ch. 408, § 2; T.C.A., § 9-622; Acts 1993, ch. 303, § 1; T.C.A. §9-6-202; Acts 2015, ch. 92, §§ 1, 2; 2018, ch. 1031, § 1.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, §3-1-114.

Attorney General Opinions. Appropriations, constitutional limit on growth, OAG 94-92, 1994 Tenn. AG LEXIS 93 (8/26/94).

9-4-5203. Governor's budget document — Appropriations exceeding growth of state's economy — Bills — Index.

The budget document presented by the governor to the general assembly shall include a statement or showing projecting Tennessee personal income as provided in § 9-4-5201, for the ensuing fiscal year, for the calendar year in progress, for the fiscal year in progress, for the latest completed calendar year, and for calendar year 1977.

The budget document presented by the governor shall also include a statement or a summary showing recommended appropriations from state tax revenues for the ensuing fiscal year, such actual appropriations for the fiscal year in progress, and the 1977-1978 fiscal year appropriations from state tax revenues.

When in any budget document the percentage increase of recommended appropriations from state tax revenues exceeds the percentage increase of estimated Tennessee personal income as defined in § 9-4-5201, for the ensuing fiscal year, the governor shall submit a bill or bills for introduction in both houses of the general assembly which shall contain no other subject matter and shall set forth the dollar and percentage by which the estimated growth of the state's economy is exceeded by the appropriations of state tax revenue in accordance with the Constitution of Tennessee, Article II, § 24.

For purposes of determining compliance with this section and with the Constitution of Tennessee, Article II, § 24:

Funds allocated to the reserve for revenue fluctuations shall not be included as appropriations from state tax revenues; and

Funds expended from the reserve for revenue fluctuations to offset shortfalls in state tax revenue in accordance with § 9-4-211(b) shall not be included as appropriations from state tax revenues.

When the percentage increase of appropriations of state tax revenue by the general assembly exceeds the percentage increase of estimated Tennessee personal income as defined in § 9-4-5201, for the ensuing fiscal year, the general assembly shall by law containing no other subject matter, set forth the dollar and the percentage by which the estimated growth of the state's economy is exceeded by the appropriations of state tax revenue in accordance with Constitution of Tennessee, Article II, § 24.

The index of appropriations from state tax revenues for the 2011-2012 fiscal year may exceed the index of estimated growth in the state's economy by two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) or two and one one-hundredths percent (2.01%).

The index of appropriations from state tax revenues for the 2012-2013 fiscal year may exceed the index of estimated growth in the state's economy by one hundred thirty-two million five hundred thousand dollars ($132,500,000) or one percent (1.0%).

The index of appropriations from state tax revenues for the 2016-2017 fiscal year may exceed the index of estimated growth in the state's economy by four hundred thirty-eight million dollars ($438,000,000) or two and eighty-five hundredths percent (2.85%).

The index of appropriations from state tax revenues for the 2019-2020 fiscal year may exceed the index of estimated growth in the state's economy by six hundred twenty-nine million dollars ($629,000,000) or three and six-tenths percent (3.6%).

Acts 1979, ch. 408, § 3; T.C.A., § 9-623; Acts 1984 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 9, § 1; 1984 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 11, § 1; 1985, ch. 446, § 1; 1985, ch. 447, § 1; 1986, ch. 938, § 1; 1989, ch. 577, § 1; 1989, ch. 578, § 1; 1991, ch. 520, § 1; 1992, ch. 1004, § 1; 1997, ch. 512, § 1; T.C.A. §9-6-203; Acts 1999, ch. 402, § 1; 2000, ch. 992, § 1; 2002, ch. 857, § 1; 2004, ch. 960, § 1; 2007, ch. 589, § 1; 2007, ch. 590, § 1; 2009, ch. 553, § 1; 2010, ch. 1110, § 1; 2011, ch. 471, § 1; 2012, ch. 1025, § 1; 2013, ch. 451, § 1; 2017, ch. 463, § 1; 2018, ch. 689, § 1; 2020, ch. 650, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Former subsection (e), concerning the amount by which the index of appropriations from state tax revenues may exceed the index of estimated growth in the state’s economy in fiscal years 1984-2011, was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 2012.

Compiler's Notes. The history of §9-4-5203(e), indicating by fiscal year the dollar amount and percentage by which the index of appropriations from state tax revenues may exceed the index of estimated growth in the state’s economy, is set out in the table below.

Rate of Growth of Appropriations Above Year-to-Year Economic Growth Rate (Millions) Fiscal Year Dollars Rate Public Act 1984-1985 $ 186.5 6.87% Acts 1984 (1st E.S.), ch. 11 1984-1985 396.1 14.60% Acts 1985, ch. 447 1985-1986 58.0 1.79% Acts 1985, ch. 446 1986-1987 100.0 2.76% Acts 1986, ch. 938 1988-1989 101.0 2.38% Acts 1989, ch. 577 1989-1990 74.0 1.59% Acts 1989, ch. 578 1991-1992 703.1 15.09% Acts 1991, ch. 520 1992-1993 450.0 8.69% Acts 1992, ch. 1004 1996-1997 55.0 0.84% Acts 1997, ch. 512 1999-2000 189.0 2.13% Acts 1999, ch. 402 1999-2000 81.0 1.00% Acts 2000, ch. 992 2002-2003 771.0 9.27% Acts 2002, ch. 857 2003-2004 275.0 2.91% Acts 2004, ch. 960 2006-2007 46.0 0.39% Acts 2007, ch. 589 2007-2008 57.3 0.46% Acts 2007, ch. 590 2009-2010 248.5 2.25% Acts 2009, ch. 553 2010-2011 126.6 1.10% Acts 2010, ch. 1110 2010-2011 250.0 2.15% Acts 2011, ch. 471 2011-2012 250.0 2.01% Acts 2012, ch. 1025 2012-2013 132.5 1.00% Acts 2013, ch. 451 2016-2017 438.0 2.85% Acts 2017, ch. 463 2019-2020 629.0 3.6% Acts 2020, ch. 650

Click to view Rate of Growth of Appropriations Above Year-to-Year Economic Growth Rate(Millions)

For the Preambles to the acts pursuant to Tenn. Const. art. II, § 24 providing for the dollar amount and rate by which the growth of appropriations from state tax revenues will exceed the estimated growth in the state's economy and to amend title 9, chapter 4, part 52, please refer to Acts 2007, chs. 589 and 590.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment added (e)(4).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 650, § 2. April 2, 2020.

Cross-References. Rate of growth of appropriations limited, Tenn. Const., art. II, § 24.

Attorney General Opinions. Both the Tenn. Const., art. II, § 24 and T.C.A. §9-4-5203 require officials to determine the percentage increase in “appropriations from state tax revenues” from the previous fiscal year in preparing the budget for each fiscal year, OAG 07-126, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 126 (8/27/07).